California statutes. Public Contract Code
(b) This section does not apply to any person, firm, or subsidiary thereof who is awarded a subcontract of a consulting services contract that amounts to no more than 10 percent of the total monetary value of the consulting services contract.

(c) This section does not apply to consulting services contracts subject to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10831.

No officer or employee of the California State University shall engage in any employment, activity, or enterprise for which the officer or employee receives compensation or in which the officer or employee has a financial interest if that employment, activity, or enterprise is sponsored or funded, or sponsored and funded, by any California State University department through or by a California State University contract unless the employment, activity, or enterprise is within the course and scope of the officer’s or employee’s regular California State University employment. No officer or employee in the California State University shall contract on his or her own individual behalf as an independent contractor with any California State University department to provide services or goods. This section shall not apply to officers or employees of the California State University with teaching or research responsibilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10832.

(a) No retired, dismissed, separated, or formerly employed person of the California State University employed with the California State University or otherwise appointed to serve in the California State University may enter into a contract in which he or she engaged in any of the negotiations, transactions, planning, arrangements, or any part of the decisionmaking process relevant to the contract while employed in any capacity by any California State University department. The prohibition of this subdivision shall apply to a person only during the two-year period beginning on the date the person left California State University employment.

(b) For a period of 12 months following the date of his or her retirement, dismissal, or separation from the California State University, no person employed in the California State University or otherwise appointed to serve in the California State University may enter into a contract with any California State University department, if he or she was employed by that department in a policymaking position in the same general subject area as the proposed contract within the 12-month period prior to his or her retirement, dismissal, or separation. The prohibition of this subdivision shall not apply to a contract requiring the person’s services as an expert witness in a civil case or to a contract for the continuation of an attorney’s services on a matter he or she was involved with prior to leaving the California State University.

(c) This section does not prohibit the rehire or reappointment of California State University employees after retirement, consistent with California State University administrative policies, nor does it apply to inventors and authors of intellectual property licensed under technology transfer agreements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10833.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), each contractor who enters into a contract with a California State University campus for ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more shall be assigned an identification number by the president of that California State University campus. Each contractor who has been assigned a number shall list it on each contract the contractor enters into with the California State University campus, regardless of the amount of the contract. In the case of a corporation or firm, the president’s assigned number shall be used exclusively on each contract with that president’s campus. The assigned number shall remain unchanged regardless of future name changes.

(b) If the identification numbers cannot be tracked centrally by the Trustees of the California State University, then the trustees, and not the presidents, shall assign the identification numbers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Modifications; Performance; Payment [10840. - 10853.]

10840.

The trustees may increase or decrease quantities of work to be done under a unit basis contract during the progress of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10841.

The trustees may cause the insertion of provisions in any contract for the performance of such extra work and the furnishing of materials therefor by the contractor as the trustees require for the proper completion or construction of the whole work contemplated, if the bidders have equal opportunity of knowing the proposed terms for the extra work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10842.

The trustees may grant such extensions of time for completion as they deem for the best interests of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10843.

If the trustees deem that a contractor has failed to supply an adequate working force, or material of proper quality, or has failed in any other respect to prosecute the work with the diligence and force specified by the contract, the trustees may:

(a) After written notice of at least five days to the contractor, specifying the defaults to be remedied, provide any such labor or materials and deduct the cost from any money due or to become due to the contractor under the contract; or 

(b) If the trustees consider that the failure is sufficient ground for such action, they may give written notice of at least five days to the contractor and the contractor’s sureties, that if the defaults are not remedied the contractor’s control over the work will be terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10844.

If the defaults are not remedied within the time specified in the notice, the contractor’s control shall terminate as of the expiration of that time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10845.

Upon such termination, the trustees may take possession of and use all or any part of the contractor’s materials, tools, equipment, and appliances upon the premises to complete the contract. Thereupon, the trustees may permit the surety to complete or cause the contract work to be completed, or they may direct that all or any part of the work be completed by day’s labor or by employment of other contractors on informal contracts, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10846.

Such informal contracts may be awarded only after a proposal form has been prepared, a copy is served upon the contractor whose control has been terminated, and upon his or her surety, and three days allowed thereafter so that he or she may cause others to bid. Any person who is prequalified therefor under Article 4 (commencing with Section 10760) of this chapter may bid on informal contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10847.

The provisions of this chapter, except as to prequalifications, are not applicable to the award of informal contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10848.

If the control of a contractor is terminated or he or she abandons the work, and the work is performed by day’s labor or informal contract as provided in Section 10845, he or she is not entitled to receive any portion of the amount to be paid under the contract until it is fully completed. After completion, if the unpaid balance exceeds the sum of the amount expended by the state in finishing the work, plus all damages sustained or to be sustained by the state, the excess not otherwise required by law to be retained shall be paid to the contractor, but if such sum exceeds the unpaid balance, the contractor and his or her surety are liable to the state for the excess. If the surety completes the contract work, as provided in Section 10845, such surety shall be subrogated to money due under the contract and to money which shall become due in the course of completion by the surety, to the extent provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10849.

On the completion of the contract, the original contractor is entitled to the return of all his or her unused materials, and his or her equipment, tools, and appliances, except that he or she shall have no claim on account of usual and ordinary depreciation, loss, and wear and tear.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10850.

The notices required by this article may be served on the contractor or on his or her agent having charge of the work, personally, or by registered mail addressed to the contractor or his or her agent, or, if neither can be located or their addresses are unknown, by posting in a conspicuous place upon the premises of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10851.

Payments upon contracts shall be made as the trustees prescribe upon estimates made and approved by the trustees, but progress payments shall not be made in excess of 95 percent of the percentage of actual work completed plus a like percentage of the value of material delivered on the ground or stored subject to or under the control of the state, and unused. The trustees shall withhold not less than 5 percent of the contract price until final completion and acceptance of the project. The Controller shall draw warrants upon estimates so made and approved by the trustees and the Treasurer shall pay them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10852.

At the request and expense of the contractor, and with the approval of the trustees, any amount withheld pursuant to Section 10851 may be deposited with the Treasurer as the escrow agent, who shall pay such moneys to the contractor upon the placing of securities eligible for the investment of state funds under Section 16430 of the Government Code or bank certificates of deposit into such escrow account by the contractor.

“Approval of the trustees,” as used in this section, means that the trustees may, in their discretion, allow or deny the request of the contractor to avail itself of the provisions of this section and that the trustees may, in their discretion, allow the request of the contractor upon the satisfaction of conditions which may be specified by the trustees.

The contractor shall be beneficial owner of any securities in an escrow account pursuant to this section and shall receive any interest thereon.

Any escrow agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall contain as a minimum, the following provisions:

(a) The amount of securities to be deposited; such amount shall not be less than the amount which would otherwise be withheld pursuant to Section 10851;

(b) The terms and conditions of conversion to cash in case of the default of the contractor; and

(c) The termination of the escrow upon completion of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10853.

(a) If the trustees fail to make a progress payment on a contract within 39 days after receipt of an undisputed and properly submitted payment request from a contractor on a construction contract, the trustees shall pay interest to the contractor equivalent to the legal rate set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 685.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure. If the payment is not made within 39 days of receipt of the contractor’s request, and the Controller has processed the payment within 14 days of the receipt of the request, the trustees shall pay interest to the contractor equivalent to the legal rate as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 685.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure. If the payment is not made within 39 days of receipt of the contractor’s request, and the trustees have processed the payment within 25 days after the receipt of the request, the Controller shall pay interest equivalent to the legal rate as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 685.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) Upon receipt of a payment request, the trustees shall act in accordance with the following:

(1) Each payment request shall be reviewed by the trustees as soon as practicable after receipt for the purpose of determining that the payment request is a proper payment request.

(2) Any payment request determined not to be a proper request suitable for payment shall be returned to the contractor as soon as practicable, but not later than seven days after receipt. A request returned pursuant to this paragraph shall be accompanied by a document setting forth in writing the reasons why the payment request is not proper.

(3) Upon request from the trustees, the Controller may elect to expedite each payment request and may charge the trustees an appropriate amount, as determined by the Controller, for costs incurred in expediting the payment request.

(c) The number of days available to the trustees to make a payment without incurring interest shall be reduced by the number of days by which the trustees exceed the seven-day return requirement set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(d) A properly submitted payment request shall be defined as the date upon which the trustees receive a payment request, certified in accordance with the contract, at the address identified in the contract.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) A “progress payment” includes all payments due contractors, except that portion of the final payment withheld pursuant to Section 10851.

(2) A payment request shall be considered properly executed if funds are available for payment of the payment request and payment is not delayed due to an audit inquiry by the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 799, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Offenses [10870. - 11005.]

10870.

Any officer or employee of the trustees who corruptly performs any official act to the injury of the state, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10871.

Any contractor or his or her agent or employee who corruptly permits the violation of any contract awarded under this chapter to the injury of the state is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10872.

Any subcontractor or agent or employee of any contractor or subcontractor, who has knowledge of any work being done in violation of any contract under this chapter and does not immediately notify the trustees or the inspector or resident engineer upon the project of the violation, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10873.

Such felonies are punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 556.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

10874.

Such persons are also liable to the state for double the amount the state may have lost, or be liable to lose by reason of the acts made crimes by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.

“Spouse,” as used in this code, includes “registered domestic partner,” as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 91.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Acquisition of Information Technology Goods and Services  [12100. - 12113.]

12100.

(a) The Legislature finds that the unique aspects of information technology goods and services and their importance to state programs warrant a separate body of governing statutes. The Legislature further finds that this separate body of governing statutes should enable the timely acquisition of information technology goods and services to meet the state’s needs in the most value-effective manner.

(b) (1) All contracts for the acquisition of information technology goods and services related to information technology projects defined in Chapter 4800 of the State Administrative Manual shall be made by or under the supervision of the Department of Technology consistent with this chapter.

(2) The Department of Technology shall have the authority necessary for the acquisition of information technology goods and services related to information technology projects as prescribed in this chapter.

(c) The Department of Technology shall have the final authority in the determination of information technology procurement policy.

(d) The Department of Technology shall have the final authority in the determination of information technology procurement procedures applicable to acquisitions subject to subdivision (b) and telecommunications procurements made pursuant to Section 12120.

(e) The Department of Technology shall have the final authority in the determination of procurement policy in telecommunications procurements made pursuant to Section 12120.

(f) Except as expressly provided in subdivision (b), all contracts for the acquisition of information technology goods or services, whether by lease or purchase, shall be made by or under the supervision of the Department of General Services.

(g) Except as expressly provided in subdivision (d), the Department of General Services shall have the final authority in the determination of information technology procurement procedures. This includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Acquisitions delegated by the Department of General Services pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 12102.2, if the Department of Technology has also delegated project authority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11546 of the Government Code.

(2) Acquisitions of information technology goods or services relating to information technology projects delegated by the Department of Technology under subdivision (b) of Section 11546 of the Government Code, but not delegated by the Department of General Services under paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 12102.2.

(3) If the Department of Technology has not delegated project authority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11546 of the Government Code, but the Department of General Services has delegated acquisition authority pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 12102.2 and the Department of Technology has authorized the state agency to conduct the acquisition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 50.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12100.5.

The Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall not be subject to this chapter except that the trustees shall develop policies and procedures maintained in its state university administrative manual and the board shall adopt policies and procedures maintained in its administrative manual that further the legislative policies for contracting expressed in this chapter but without the involvement of the Director of Finance, the Director of General Services, the Department of Finance, the Department of General Services, the Director of Technology, or the Department of Technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 52.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12100.6.

The Trustees of the California State University are subject to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 10115) of Chapter 1. The contents of any report that the trustees are required to submit to the Governor and the Legislature pursuant to that article shall be organized so that, whenever applicable, each campus is individually featured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1097, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12100.7.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Multiple award schedule” (MAS) is an agreement established between the General Services Administration of the United States and certain suppliers to do business under specific prices, terms, and conditions for specified goods, information technology, and services.

(b) “Multiple award” means a contract of indefinite quantity for one or more similar goods, information technology, or services to more than one supplier.

(c) “Procedures” means the rules, methods, and practices to be followed in conducting information technology procurements.

(d) “Policies” means determining what information technology goods or services are to be purchased and by whom.

(e) For purposes of this chapter, “value-effective acquisition” may be defined to include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The operational cost that the state would incur if the bid or proposal is accepted.

(2) Quality of the product or service, or its technical competency.

(3) Reliability of delivery and implementation schedules.

(4) The maximum facilitation of data exchange and systems integration.

(5) Warranties, guarantees, and return
 policy.

(6) Supplier financial stability.

(7) Consistency of the proposed solution with the state’s planning documents and announced strategic program direction.

(8) Quality and effectiveness of business solution and approach.

(9) Industry and program experience.

(10) Prior record of supplier performance.

(11) Supplier expertise with engagements of similar scope and complexity.

(12) Extent and quality of the proposed participation and acceptance by all user groups.

(13) Proven development
 methodologies and tools.

(14) Innovative use of current technologies and quality results.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 53.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12101.

It is the intent of the Legislature that policies and procedures developed by the Department of Technology and the Department of General Services in accordance with this chapter provide for the following:

(a) The expeditious and value-effective acquisition of information technology goods and services to satisfy state requirements.

(b) The acquisition of information technology goods and services within a competitive framework.

(c) The delegation of authority by the Department of General Services to each state agency that has demonstrated to the department’s satisfaction the ability to conduct value-effective
 information technology goods and services acquisitions.

(d) The exclusion from state bid processes, at the state’s option, of any supplier having failed to meet prior contractual requirements related to information technology goods and services.

(e) The review and resolution of protests submitted by any bidders with respect to any information technology goods and services acquisitions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 54.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12101.2.

The Department of General Services shall prenegotiate the repetitively used terms and conditions in the state’s model contract with each interested vendor who bids or proposes on electronic data processing or telecommunications procurements. The contract language shall be kept on file, as a matter of public record, and shall remain operational until either the state or the vendor provides 30 days’ notice to the other party that new negotiations are deemed appropriate.

If, for a particular procurement, the state seeks to make any further changes to either the negotiated or the standard contract language, or both, it shall identify those changes to each bidder or proposer prior to the due date for the bid or proposal. If for a
 particular procurement, a bidder or proposer seeks to propose a negotiated change or standard contract language change, it shall make this identification within the timeframe identified in the solicitation document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 55.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12101.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that agencies of the state use an acquisition method that is compatible with their short- and long-term fiscal needs in contracts relating to commodities and information technology goods and services. State agencies should be able to specify their anticipated life cycle requirements that would become one of the criteria for contractor selection. These agencies should be given the choice of suppliers to meet statewide standardization needs, unique service requirements, application requirements, and long-term satisfaction criteria. There is a need for the state to enter into long-term contracts with annual cancellation and fund-out clauses, as required, to protect the state’s interests as well as provide the
 option for multiyear renewals to encourage suppliers to develop higher levels of service and support throughout the contracts.

(b) The state may utilize multiple awards, including federal General Service Administration Multiple Awards Schedules and master agreements or contracts for goods, information technology, services, or consulting services. For purposes of this subdivision, a multiple award is an award of an indefinite quantity contract for one or more similar goods, information technology, or services to more than one supplier. Except for possible multiple awards as permitted by this subdivision, and except as described in subdivision (d), all the requirements of this chapter pertaining to other types of information technology acquisitions shall be followed. The Department of General Services shall administer this section and ensure that multiple award schedules are in compliance with all other applicable statutes.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, state agencies, in exercising their contracting authority delegated by the Department of General Services, may contract with suppliers who have multiple award schedules with the General Services Administration of the United States on the same terms, conditions, and prices if the supplier is willing to do so. The Department of General Services may also develop multiple award schedules or agreements for use by state agencies in the same manner. The Department of General Services shall determine the delegation contracting authority for agencies wishing to use multiple award schedules.

(d) For contracts related to information technology integration or development projects that generate revenues or achieve savings over a quantifiable baseline of existing costs, state agencies shall consider and may incorporate performance-based or
 share-in-savings contract terms to manage risks and create incentives for successful contract performance. Performance-based or share-in-savings contracts may have the following characteristics, among others:

(1) Contract terms that specify business outcomes to be achieved, not the solution to be provided.

(2) Contract terms that structure the contract to maintain maximum vendor commitment to project success and minimize risk to the state by sharing risk with the private sector.

(3) Utilization of “best value” evaluation methods, which means to select the solution that will achieve the best result based on business performance measures, not necessarily the lowest price.

(4) Contract terms that base payments to the vendor primarily on achieving
 predefined performance measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 56.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12101.7.

(a) Notwithstanding the sealed bidding provisions of this chapter, reverse auctions may be utilized for the acquisition of information technology, in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 10290.3.

(b) For purposes of this section, “reverse auction” means a competitive online solicitation process for fungible information technology in which vendors compete against each other online in real time in an open and interactive environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 266, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.

(a) The Department of General Services shall maintain, in the State Administrative Manual, all policies and procedures governing the acquisition and disposal of information technology goods and services, including, but not limited to, the policies and procedures that the Department of Technology is authorized to establish for the acquisition of information technology projects. The Department of Technology shall provide a link to information technology policies and procedures in the State Administrative Manual on the homepage of the Internet Web site.

(b) Except as specified in Section 12102.1, acquisition of information technology goods and services shall be conducted through
 competitive means, except when the Director of General Services determines that (1) the goods and services proposed for acquisition are the only goods and services which can meet the state’s need, or (2) the goods and services are needed in cases of emergency where immediate acquisition is necessary for the protection of the public health, welfare, or safety. The acquisition mode to be used and the procedure to be followed shall be approved by the Director of General Services. The Department of General Services shall maintain, in the State Administrative Manual, appropriate criteria and procedures to ensure compliance with the intent of this chapter. These criteria and procedures shall include acquisition and contracting guidelines to be followed by state agencies with respect to the acquisition of information technology goods and services. These guidelines may be in the form of standard formats or model formats.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 57.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.1.

(a) The Department of Technology shall establish in the State Administrative Manual all of the following:

(1) Policies governing the acquisition of information technology projects.

(2) Procedures governing the acquisition of information technology projects reportable under Chapter 4800 of the State Administrative Manual and not delegated under subdivision (e) of Section 12102.2.

(3) Policies and procedures governing the acquisition of telecommunications goods and services, as authorized under Section 12120.

(b) Acquisition of information technology goods and services that are subject to subdivision (a) shall be conducted through competitive means, except when the Director of Technology determines that (1) the goods and services proposed for acquisition are the only goods and services that can meet the state’s need, or (2) the goods and services are needed for an emergency and immediate acquisition and are necessary for the protection of the public health, welfare, or safety. The acquisition mode to be used and the procedure to be followed shall be approved by the Director of Technology. The Department of Technology shall establish, in the State Administrative Manual, appropriate criteria and procedures to ensure compliance with the intent of this chapter. These criteria and procedures shall include acquisition and contracting guidelines to be followed by state agencies with respect to the acquisition of information technology projects that are reportable under State Administrative Manual Section
 4800 et seq. These guidelines may be in the form of standard formats or model formats.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 58.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 93 of Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.2.

(a) Contract awards for all large-scale systems integration projects shall be based on the proposal that provides the most value-effective solution to the state’s requirements, as determined by the evaluation criteria contained in the solicitation document. Evaluation criteria for the acquisition of information technology goods and services, including systems integration, shall provide for the selection of a contractor on an objective basis not limited to cost alone.

(1) The Department of Technology shall invite active participation, review, advice, comment, and assistance from the private sector and state agencies in developing procedures to streamline and to make the acquisition process more efficient, including, but not limited to, consideration of
 comprehensive statements in the request for proposals of the business needs and governmental functions, access to studies, planning documents, feasibility study reports and draft requests for proposals applicable to solicitations, minimizing the time and cost of the proposal submittal and selection process, and development of a procedure for submission and evaluation of a single proposal rather than multiple proposals.

(2) Solicitations for acquisitions based on evaluation criteria other than cost alone shall provide that sealed cost proposals shall be submitted and that they shall be opened at a time and place designated in the solicitation for bids and proposals. Evaluation of all criteria, other than cost, shall be completed before the time designated for public opening of cost proposals, and the results of the completed evaluation shall be published immediately before the opening of cost proposals. The state’s contact person for
 administration of the solicitation shall be identified in the solicitation for bids and proposals, and that person shall execute a certificate under penalty of perjury, which shall be made a permanent part of the official contract file, that all cost proposals received by the state have been maintained, sealed and under lock and key, until the time cost proposals are opened.

(b) The acquisition of hardware acquired independently of a system integration project may be made on the basis of lowest cost meeting all other specifications.

(c) The 5 percent small business preference provided for in Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 14835) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the regulations implementing that chapter shall be accorded to all qualifying small businesses.

(d) For all transactions
 formally advertised, evaluation of bidders’ proposals for the purpose of determining contract award for information technology goods shall provide for consideration of a bidder’s best financing alternatives, including lease or purchase alternatives, if any bidder so requests, not less than 30 days prior to the date of final bid submission, unless the acquiring agency can prove to the satisfaction of the Department of General Services that a particular financing alternative should not be so considered.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 12100:

(1) Acquisition authority may be delegated by the Director of General Services, in consultation with the Department of Technology, to any state agency that has been determined to be capable of effective use of that authority. This authority may be limited by the Department of General Services. A state agency shall not conduct an acquisition for
 information technology goods and services related to an information technology project under delegated acquisition authority pursuant to this section unless the Department of Technology has done one of the following:

(A) Delegated project authority to that state agency pursuant to Section 11546 of the Government Code.

(B) Authorized the state agency to conduct the acquisition.

(2) Acquisitions conducted under delegated acquisition authority shall be reviewed by the Department of General Services on a selective basis.

(3) The Department of General Services shall maintain procedures for complying with the State Agency Buy Recycled Campaign (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12153)). The procedures shall include procedures for meeting the minimum recycled
 content requirements in state contracting as established by CalRecycle pursuant to Section 12209 and procedures for complying with reporting requirements as established by CalRecycle pursuant to Section 12211.

(f) To the extent practical, the solicitation documents shall provide for a contract to be written to enable acquisition of additional items to avoid essentially redundant acquisition processes when it can be determined that it is economical to do so.

(g) Protest procedures shall be developed to provide bidders an opportunity to protest any formal, competitive acquisition conducted in accordance with this chapter. The procedures shall provide that protests must be filed no later than five working days after the issuance of an intent to award. Authority to protest may be limited to participating bidders. The Director of Technology, or a person designated by the director, may
 consider and decide on initial protests of bids for information technology projects conducted by the Department of Technology and telecommunications procurement made pursuant to Section 12120. The Director of General Services, or a person designated by the director, may consider and decide on initial protests of all other information technology acquisitions. A decision regarding an initial protest shall be final. If, before the last day to protest, any bidder who has submitted an offer files a protest with the department against the awarding of the contract on the ground that their bid or proposal should have been selected in accordance with the selection criteria in the solicitation document, the contract shall not be awarded until either the protest has been withdrawn or the Department of General Services has made a final decision as to the action to be taken relating to the protest. Within 10 calendar days after filing a protest, the protesting bidder shall file with the Department of General Services a
 full and complete written statement specifying in detail the grounds of the protest and the facts in support thereof.

(h) Consistent with the procedures established and administered by the Department of General Services, information technology goods that have been determined to be surplus to state needs shall be disposed of in a manner that will best serve the interests of the state. Procedures governing the disposal of surplus goods may include auction or transfer to local governmental entities.
